Wyoming, session 2025, HB0020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(x)(B)(intro) is amended
to read:
21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
(x) Subject to review by the school facilities
commission under W.S. 21-15-117 for any project involving
state capital construction assistance, fix the site of each
school building and facility considering the needs of the
people of each portion of the district. If the district
enters into an agreement to lease buildings and facilities
owned by the district and the buildings and facilities are
included within the statewide database maintained by the
state construction department under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(iv),
the district shall, except as provided under W.S.
21-15-109(c)(i)(A)(II) and (III) and (B), ensure the lease
agreement requires sufficient payment from the lessee to
cover expenses necessary to adequately maintain the
facility or building in accordance with statewide adequacy
standards prescribed by the commission. If the district or
a charter school operating within the boundaries of the
district enters into an agreement to lease buildings and
facilities under which the district or the charter school
is the lessee and the building is to be used for the
provision of the required educational program within the
district, the lease agreement shall require the lessor to
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
adequately maintain the buildings and facilities in
accordance with standards prescribed by the commission. The
lease agreement shall separately identify the amount to be
expended on the major maintenance of the building or
facility during the term of the lease. The amount of the
total lease agreement to be expended on the major
maintenance shall be accounted for and reported separately
and shall not be transferred or expended for any purpose
other than major maintenance of the leased building or
facility. No expenditure shall be made from the funds
dedicated for major maintenance of a leased facility
without the approval of the district or the charter school.
A district or charter school may request review of the
amount to be expended on major maintenance for a lease by
the school facilities division of the state construction
department to determine the reasonableness of the major
maintenance expense. The district shall be reimbursed for
the lease payment of the district or the charter school if
the square footage of the leased facility is not included
within the district's total square footage for purposes of
major maintenance computations under W.S. 21-15-109,
subject to the following:
(B) Any payment made by the department
pursuant to this paragraph for a leased building or
facility shall not exceed be equal to the lesser of the
amount of the total lease agreement or the average cost per
square foot to lease buildings or facilities comparable to
those appropriate for public K-12 education multiplied by
the total allowable square feet leased by the district or
charter school necessary to deliver the required
educational program. The average cost per square foot for
comparable buildings or facilities shall:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3